Vermont statutes. Title 26 Professions and Occupations
Subchapter 4. Unprofessional Conduct and Discipline

§ 1719.
Unprofessional conduct.

Unprofessional conduct is the conduct prohibited by this section and by

3 V.S.A. § 129a

, whether committed by a licensee, an applicant, or a person who later becomes an applicant.

Unprofessional conduct means:

Conduct that evidences moral unfitness to practice the occupation.

Any of the following except when reasonably undertaken in an emergency situation in order to protect life, health, or property:

Practicing or offering to practice beyond the scope permitted by law.

Performing treatments or providing services that a licensee is not qualified to perform or that are beyond the scope of the licensee’s education, training, capabilities, experience, or scope of practice.

Performing occupational services that have not been authorized by the consumer or his or her legal representative.

Any of the following with regard to the buyer's prescription or purchase of ophthalmic goods:

[Repealed.]

Conditioning the availability of an eye examination to any person on a requirement that person agree to purchase any ophthalmic goods from the optometrists.

Charging the buyer any fee in addition to the optometrist's examination fee as a condition to releasing the prescription to the buyer. Provided, an optometrist may charge an additional fee for verifying ophthalmic goods dispensed by another seller when the additional fee is imposed at the time the verification is performed.

Placing on the prescription or requiring the buyer to sign, or delivering to the buyer a form or notice waiving or disclaiming the liability or responsibility of the optometrist for the accuracy of the eye examination or the accuracy of the prescription for ophthalmic goods or services to be dispensed by another seller.

Failure to comply with prescription-released requirements established in the Federal Ophthalmic Practice Rule (16 C.F.R. Part 456) or the Fairness to Contact Lens Consumers Act (15 U.S.C.A. § 7601-7610).

After hearing, the Board may take disciplinary action against a licensee or applicant found guilty of unprofessional conduct.

HISTORY:

Added

1979, No. 158

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

1983, No. 242

(Adj. Sess.), §§ 7-9;

1993, No. 108

(Adj. Sess.), § 8;

1997, No. 145

(Adj. Sess.), § 41;

2003, No. 108

(Adj. Sess.), § 2;

2009, No. 103

(Adj. Sess.), § 12;

2011, No. 116

(Adj. Sess.), § 24;

2019, No. 30

, § 12.

§ 1720.
Repealed.
1989, No. 250 (Adj. Sess.), § 92.

§ 1721.
Repealed. 2009, No. 35, § 41(a).